Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 13 Labor and Payment of Debts by Contractors

37-13-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Public works” means any public work consisting of grading, clearing, demolition, improvement, completion, repair, alteration, or construction of any public road or any bridge, or portion thereof, or any public building, or portion thereof, or any heavy construction, or any public works projects of any nature or kind whatsoever.

“School transportation services” means those transportation and related services provided for the transportation of public and private students pursuant to §§

16-21-1

and

16-21.1-8

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 290, § 2; P.L. 1955, ch. 3580, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-1

; P.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 292, § 3, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 293, § 3, effective July 9, 2021.

37-13-2.
“Contractor” defined — Information required.

The term “contractor” as used in this chapter shall mean the bidder whose bid has been accepted by an authorized agency or awarding authority as the bidder possessing the skills, ability, and integrity necessary to the faithful performance of the contract or work, and who shall certify that he or she is able to furnish labor that can work in harmony with all other elements of labor employed or to be employed on the contract or work. Essential information in regard to qualifications shall be submitted in such form to the awarding authority and the director of labor and training as the director of labor and training shall require. The authorized agency or awarding authority shall reserve the right to reject all bids, if it be in the public interest to do so.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 290, § 14; P.L. 1955, ch. 3580, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-2

; P.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 1.

37-13-3.
Contractors subject to provisions — Weekly payment of employees.

All contractors, who have been awarded contracts for public works by an awarding agency or authority of the state or of any city, town, committee, or by any person or persons therein, in which state or municipal funds are used and of which the contract price shall be in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000), whether payable at the time of the signing of the contract or at a later date, and their subcontractors, on those public works shall pay their employees at weekly intervals and shall comply with the provisions set forth in §§

37-13-4

—

37-13-14

and §

37-13-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2361, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 290, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3580, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-3

; P.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 117, § 1.

37-13-3.1.
State public works contract apprenticeship requirements.

Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, all general contractors and subcontractors who perform work on any public works contract awarded by the state after passage of this act and valued at one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more shall employ apprentices required for the performance of the awarded contract. The number of apprentices shall comply with the apprentice-to-journeyman ratio for each trade approved by the apprenticeship council of the department of labor and training. To the extent that any of the provisions contained in this section conflict with the requirements for federal aid contracts, federal law and regulations shall control.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to contracts for school transportation services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 310, § 14; P.L. 2014, ch. 20, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 292, § 3, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 293, § 3, effective July 9, 2021.

37-13-3.2.
Entities subject to provisions — Weekly payment of employees.

All persons, firms, corporations, or other entities who or that have been awarded school transportation service contracts by an awarding agency or authority of the state or of any city, town, committee, or by any person or persons therein, in which state or municipal funds are used and of which the contract price shall be in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000), whether payable at the time of the signing of the contract or at a later date, and their subcontractors, engaged as part of the service contract, shall pay their employees at weekly intervals and shall comply with the provisions set forth in §§

37-13-6

through

37-13-13.1

,

37-13-14.1

, and

37-13-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 292, § 4, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 293, § 4, effective July 9, 2021.

37-13-4.
Provisions applicable to public works contracts — Lists of subcontractors.

All public works shall be done by contract, subject to the same provisions of law relating thereto and to the letting thereof, which are applicable to similar contracts of the awarding authority or authorized agency, hereinafter called the “proper authority”, in the general location where the work is to be performed and which are not contrary to the provisions of §§

37-13-1

—

37-13-1

4 and §

37-13-16

. Each contractor after the award of a contract for public works shall submit to the proper authority a list of his or her subcontractors of any part or all of the work. The list shall be submitted in such manner or form as the proper authority shall uniformly require from contractors in all public works.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2361, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 290, §§ 1, 3; P.L. 1955, ch. 3580, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-4

; P.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 1.

37-13-5.
Payment for trucking or materials furnished — Withholding of sums due.

A contractor or subcontractor on public works authorized by a proper authority shall pay any obligation or charge for trucking and material which have been furnished for the use of the contractor or subcontractor, in connection with the public works being performed by him or her, within ninety (90) days after the obligation or charge is incurred or the trucking service has been performed or the material has been delivered to the site of the work, whichever is later. When it is brought to the notice of the proper authority in a city or town, or the proper authority in the state having supervision of the contract, that the obligation or charge has not been paid by the contractor or subcontractor, the proper authority may deduct and hold for a period not exceeding sixty (60) days, from sums of money due to the contractor or subcontractor, the equivalent amount of such sums certified by a trucker or materialman creditor as due him or her, as provided in this section, and which the proper authority determines is reasonable for trucking performed or materials furnished for the public works.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2361, §§ 2, 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 290, §§ 2, 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 290, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3580, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-5

; P.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 1.

37-13-6.
Ascertainment of prevailing rate of wages and other payments — Specification of rate in call for bids and in contract.

Before awarding any contract for public works or school transportation services to be done, the proper authority shall ascertain from the director of labor and training the general prevailing rate of the regular, holiday, and overtime wages paid and the general prevailing payments on behalf of employees only, to lawful welfare, pension, vacation, apprentice training, and educational funds (payments to the funds must constitute an ordinary business expense deduction for federal income tax purposes by contractors) in the city, town, village, or other appropriate political subdivision of the state in which the work is to be performed, for each craft, mechanic, teamster, laborer, or type of worker needed to execute the contract for the public works or school transportation services. The proper authority shall, also, specify in the call for bids for the contract and in the contract itself the general prevailing rate of the regular, holiday, and overtime wages paid and the payments on behalf of employees only, to the welfare, pension, vacation, apprentice training, and education funds existing in the locality for each craft, mechanic, teamster, laborer, or type of worker needed to execute the contract or work.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1752, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2201, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 290, § 5; P.L. 1955, ch. 3580, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-6

; P.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 162; P.L. 2021, ch. 292, § 3, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 293, § 3, effective July 9, 2021.

37-13-7.
Specification in contract of amount and frequency of payment of wages.

Every call for bids for every contract in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000), to which the state of Rhode Island or any political subdivision thereof or any public agency or quasi-public agency is a party, for the transportation of public and private school pupils pursuant to §§

16-21-1

and

16-21.1-8

, or for construction, alteration, and/or repair, including painting and decorating, of public buildings or public works of the state of Rhode Island or any political subdivision thereof, or any public agency or quasi-public agency and that requires or involves the employment of employees, shall contain a provision stating the minimum wages to be paid various types of employees which shall be based upon the wages that will be determined by the director of labor and training to be prevailing for the corresponding types of employees employed on projects of a character similar to the contract work in the city, town, village, or other appropriate political subdivision of the state of Rhode Island in which the work is to be performed. Every contract shall contain a stipulation that the contractor or his or her subcontractor shall pay all the employees employed directly upon the site of the work, unconditionally and not less often than once a week, and without subsequent deduction or rebate on any account, the full amounts accrued at time of payment computed at wage rates not less than those stated in the call for bids, regardless of any contractual relationships that may be alleged to exist between the contractor or subcontractor and the employees, and that the scale of wages to be paid shall be posted by the contractor in a prominent and easily accessible place at the site of the work; and the further stipulation that there may be withheld from the contractor so much of the accrued payments as may be considered necessary to pay to the employees employed by the contractor, or any subcontractor on the work, the difference between the rates of wages required by the contract to be paid the employees on the work and the rates of wages received by the employees and not refunded to the contractor, subcontractors, or their agents.

The terms “wages,” “scale of wages,” “wage rates,” “minimum wages,” and “prevailing wages” shall include:

The basic hourly rate of pay; and

The amount of:

The rate of contribution made by a contractor or subcontractor to a trustee or to a third person pursuant to a fund, plan, or program; and

The rate of costs to the contractor, subcontractor, vendor, or provider that may be reasonably anticipated in providing benefits to employees pursuant to an enforceable commitment to carry out a financially responsible plan or program that was communicated in writing to the employees affected, for medical or hospital care, pensions on retirement or death, compensation for injuries or illness resulting from occupational activity, or insurance to provide any of the foregoing, for unemployment benefits, life insurance, disability and sickness insurance, or accident insurance, for vacation and holiday pay, for defraying costs of apprenticeship or other similar programs, or for other bona fide fringe benefits, but only where the contractor or subcontractor is not required by other federal, state, or local law to provide any of the benefits; provided, that the obligation of a contractor or subcontractor to make payment in accordance with the prevailing wage determinations of the director of labor and training insofar as this chapter of this title and other acts incorporating this chapter of this title by reference are concerned may be discharged by the making of payments in cash, by the making of contributions of a type referred to in subsection (b)(2), or by the assumption of an enforceable commitment to bear the costs of a plan or program of a type referred to in this subdivision, or any combination thereof, where the aggregate of any payments, contributions, and costs is not less than the rate of pay described in subsection (b)(1) plus the amount referred to in subsection (b)(2).

The term “employees,” as used in this section, shall include:

Employees of contractors or subcontractors performing jobs on various types of public works including mechanics, apprentices, teamsters, chauffeurs, and laborers engaged in the transportation of gravel or fill to the site of public works, the removal and/or delivery of gravel or fill or ready-mix concrete, sand, bituminous stone, or asphalt flowable fill from the site of public works, or the transportation or removal of gravel or fill from one location to another on the site of public works, and the employment of the employees shall be subject to the provisions of subsections (a) and (b); and

Persons employed by a provider contracted for the purpose of transporting public and private school pupils pursuant to §§

16-21-1

and

16-21.1-8

shall be subject to the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section. For the purposes of this subsection the term employee includes school bus drivers, aides, and monitors who are directly providing transportation services; the term employee does not include mechanics, dispatchers, or other personnel employed by the vendor whose duties are normally performed at a fixed location.

The terms “public agency” and “quasi-public agency” shall include, but not be limited to: the Rhode Island industrial recreational building authority, the Rhode Island commerce corporation, the Rhode Island airport corporation, the Rhode Island industrial facilities corporation, the Rhode Island refunding bond authority, the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation, the Rhode Island public transit authority, the Rhode Island student loan authority, the water resources board corporate, the Rhode Island health and education building corporation, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority, the Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission, the Rhode Island telecommunications authority, the convention center authority, the council on postsecondary education, the council on elementary and secondary education, the capital center commission, the housing resources commission, the Quonset Point-Davisville management corporation, the Rhode Island children’s crusade for higher education, the Rhode Island depositors economic protection corporation, the Rhode Island lottery commission, the Rhode Island partnership for science and technology, the Rhode Island public building authority, and the Rhode Island underground storage tank board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 237, § 3; P.L. 1976, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 16; P.L. 2021, ch. 292, § 3, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 293, § 3, effective July 9, 2021.

37-13-8.
Investigation and determination of prevailing wages — Filing of schedule.

The director of labor and training shall investigate and determine the prevailing wages and payments made to or on behalf of employees, as set forth in §

37-13-7

, paid in the trade or occupation in the city, town, village, or other appropriate political subdivision of the state and keep a schedule on file in his or her office of the customary prevailing rate of wages and payments made to or on behalf of the employees that shall be open to public inspection. In making a determination, the director of labor may adopt and use such appropriate and applicable prevailing wage rate determinations as have been made by the secretary of labor of the United States of America in accordance with the Davis-Bacon Act, as amended, 40 U.S.C. § 276a [40 U.S.C. § 3141 et seq.]; provided, however, that each contractor awarded a public works or school transportation services contract after July 1, 2007, shall contact the department of labor and training on or before July first of each year, for the duration of such contract to ascertain the prevailing wage rate of wages on an hourly basis and the amount of payment or contributions paid or payable on behalf of each mechanic, laborer, or worker employed upon the work contracted to be done each year and shall make any necessary adjustments to such prevailing rate of wages and such payment or contributions paid or payable on behalf of each such employee every July first.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 237, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 521, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 292, § 3, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 293, § 3, effective July 9, 2021.

37-13-9.
Statutory provisions included in contracts.

A copy of §§

37-13-5

,

37-13-6

, and

37-13-7

shall be inserted in all contracts for public works or school transportation services awarded by the state, any city, town, committee, an authorized agency, or awarding authority thereof, or any person or persons in their behalf in which state or municipal funds are used if the contract price is in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2361, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 290, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 290, § 7; P.L. 1955, ch. 3580, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-8

; P.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 292, § 3, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 293, § 3, effective July 9, 2021.

37-13-10.
Overtime compensation.

Labor performed under the provisions of §§

37-13-1

—

37-13-16

, during the period of forty (40) hours in any one week and during the period of eight (8) hours in any one day, shall be considered a legal week’s work or a legal day’s work, as the case may be, and any number of hours of employment in any one week greater than the number of forty (40) hours or in any one day greater than the number of eight (8) hours shall be compensated at the prevailing rate of wages for overtime employment; provided, however, when the director of labor and training has determined in the investigation provided for in §§

37-13-7

and

37-13-8

that there is a prevailing practice in a city, town, or other appropriate political subdivision to pay an overtime rate of wages for work of any craft, mechanic, teamster, laborer, or type of worker needed to execute the work other than hours worked in any one week greater than the number of forty (40) or in hours worked in any one day greater than the number of eight (8), then the prevailing practice shall determine the legal workday and the legal workweek in the city or town for the work and the prevailing rate of overtime wages shall be paid for such work in excess of that legal workday or week, as the case may be.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 290, § 6; P.L. 1946, ch. 1810, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 290, § 15; P.L. 1955, ch. 3580, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-9

; P.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-10

; P.L. 1974, ch. 237, § 1.

37-13-11.
Posting of prevailing wage rates.

Each contractor or provider awarded a contract for public works or school transportation services with a contract price in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000), and each subcontractor who performs work on those public works, shall post in conspicuous places on the project, where covered workers are employed, posters that contain the current, prevailing rate of wages and the current, prevailing rate of payments to the funds required to be paid for each craft or type of worker employed to execute the contract as set forth in §§

37-13-6

and

37-13-7

, and the rights and remedies of any employee described in §

37-13-17

for nonpayment of any wages earned pursuant to this chapter. Posters shall be furnished to contractors and subcontractors by the director of labor and training, who shall determine the size and context thereof from time to time, at the time a contract is awarded. A contractor or subcontractor who fails to comply with the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall pay to the director of labor and training one hundred dollars ($100) for each calendar day of noncompliance as determined by him or her. Contracts set forth in this section shall not be awarded by the state, any city, town, or any agency thereof until the director of labor and training has prepared and delivered the posters to the division of purchases, if the state or any agency thereof is the proper authority, or to the city, town, or an agency thereof, if it is the proper authority, and the contractor to whom the contract is to be awarded.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 290, §§ 9, 10; P.L. 1955, ch. 3580, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-10

; P.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-11

; P.L. 1974, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 292, § 3, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 293, § 3, effective July 9, 2021.

37-13-12.
Wage records of contractors and vendors.

Each contractor, vendor, or provider awarded a contract with a contract price in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for public works or school transportation services, and each subcontractor who performs work on those public works, shall keep an accurate record showing the name, occupation, and actual wages paid to each worker employed by him or her and the payments to all the employee funds specified in §§

37-13-6

and

37-13-7

by him or her in connection with the contract or work. The director and his or her authorized representatives shall have the right to enter any place of employment at all reasonable hours for the purpose of inspecting the wage records and seeing that all provisions of this chapter are complied with.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 290, § 8; P.L. 1955, ch. 3580, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-11

; P.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-12

; P.L. 1974, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 292, § 3, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 293, § 3, effective July 9, 2021.

37-13-12.1.
Obstruction of enforcement.

Any effort of any employer to obstruct the director and his or her authorized representatives in the performance of their duties shall be deemed a violation of this chapter and punishable as such.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 141, § 2.

37-13-12.2.
Subpoena powers.

The director and his or her authorized representatives shall have power to administer oaths and examine witnesses under oath, issue subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum, compel the attendance of witnesses, and the production of papers, books, accounts, records, payrolls, documents, and testimony, and to take depositions and affidavits in any proceeding before the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 141, § 2.

37-13-12.3.
Compelling obedience to subpoenas.

In case of failure of any person to comply with any subpoena lawfully issued, or subpoena duces tecum, or on the refusal of any witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, it shall be the duty of the superior court, or any judge thereof, on application by the director, to compel obedience by proceedings in the nature of those for contempt.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 141, § 2.

37-13-12.4.
Penalty for violations.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any employer who shall violate or fail to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each separate offense, or by imprisonment of up to one year, or by both fine and imprisonment. Each day of failure to pay wages due an employee at the time specified in this chapter shall constitute a separate and distinct violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 141, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 359, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 503, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 413, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 449, § 2.

37-13-13.
Furnishing payroll record to the awarding authority.

Every contractor, subcontractor, vendor, or provider awarded a contract for public works or school transportation services as defined by this chapter shall furnish a certified copy of his, her, or its payroll records of his, her, or its employees employed on the project to the awarding authority on a monthly basis for all work completed in the preceding month on a uniform form prescribed by the director of labor and training. Notwithstanding the foregoing, certified payrolls for department of transportation or other road, highway, or bridge public works may be submitted on the federal payroll form, provided that, when a complaint is being investigated, the director or his or her designee may require that a contractor resubmit the certified payroll on the uniform department form or provide actual payroll records.

Awarding authorities, contractors, subcontractors, vendors, and providers shall provide any and all payroll records to the director of labor and training within ten (10) days of their request by the director or his or her designee.

In addition, every contractor and subcontractor shall maintain on the site where public works are being constructed and the general or primary contract is one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more, a daily log of employees employed each day on the public works project. The log shall include, at a minimum, for each employee his or her name, primary job title, and employer and shall be kept on a uniform form prescribed by the director of labor and training. The log shall be available for inspection on the site at all times by the awarding authority and/or the director of the department of labor and training and the director’s designee. This subsection shall not apply to road, highway, or bridge public works projects.

The director of labor and training may promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to enforce the provisions of this section.

The awarding authority of any public works project shall withhold the next scheduled payment to any contractor, subcontractor, vendor, or provider who or that fails to comply with the provisions of subsection (a) or subsection (b) above and shall also notify the director of labor and training. The awarding authority shall withhold any further payments until such time as the contractor, subcontractor, or provider has fully complied. If it is a subcontractor who or that has failed to comply, the amount withheld shall be proportionate to the amount attributed or due to the offending subcontractor as determined by the awarding authority. The department may also impose a penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500) for each calendar day of noncompliance with this section, as determined by the director of labor and training. Mere errors and/or omissions in the daily logs maintained under subsection (c) shall not be grounds for imposing a penalty under this subsection.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 290, §§ 11, 12; P.L. 1955, ch. 3580, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-12

; P.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-13

; P.L. 1974, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 610, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 113; P.L. 2009, ch. 47, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 188, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 189, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 292, § 3, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 293, § 3, effective July 9, 2021.

37-13-13.1.
Audits of wage records of out-of-state contractors, subcontractors, and providers.

Out-of state contractors, subcontractors, vendors, or providers who perform work on public works or provide school transportation services, in this state authorize the director of labor and training to conduct wage and hour audits of their payroll records pursuant to the provisions of chapter 14 of title 28.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 292, § 3, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 293, § 3, effective July 9, 2021.

37-13-14.
Contractor’s bond.

The state or any city, town, agency, or committee therein awarding contracts for public works shall require the contractor awarded a contract with a contract price in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for public works to file with the proper authority good and sufficient bond with surety furnished by any surety company authorized to do business in the state, conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment for labor performed and material furnished in connection therewith, a bond to contain the terms and conditions set forth in chapter 12 of this title, and to be subject to the provisions of that chapter. Waiver of the bonding requirements of this section is expressly prohibited.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 290, § 13; P.L. 1955, ch. 3580, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-13

; P.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-13-14

; P.L. 1974, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 449, § 16; P.L. 1994, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 354, § 3.

37-13-14.1.
Enforcement — Hearings.

Before issuing an order or determination, the director of labor and training shall order a hearing thereon at a time and place to be specified, and shall give notice thereof, together with a copy of the complaint or the purpose thereof, or a statement of the facts disclosed upon investigation, which notice shall be served personally or by mail on any person, firm, or corporation affected thereby. The person, firm, or corporation shall have an opportunity to be heard in respect to the matters complained of at the time and place specified in the notice, which time shall be not less than five (5) days from the service of the notice personally or by mail. The hearing shall be held within ten (10) days from the order of hearing. The hearing shall be conducted by the director of labor and training or his or her designee. The hearing officer in the hearing shall be deemed to be acting in a judicial capacity and shall have the right to issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and examine witnesses. The enforcement of a subpoena issued under this section shall be regulated by Rhode Island civil practice law and rules. The hearing shall be expeditiously conducted, and upon such hearing, the hearing officer shall determine the issues raised thereon and shall make a determination and enter an order within ten (10) days of the close of the hearing, and forthwith serve a copy of the order, with a notice of the filing thereof, upon the parties to the proceeding, personally or by mail. The order shall dismiss the charges or direct payment of wages or supplements found to be due, including interest at the rate of twelve percentum (12%) per annum from the date of the underpayment to the date of payment, and may direct payment of reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to the complaining party.

In addition to directing payment of wages or supplements including interest found to be due, the order shall also require payment of a further sum as a civil penalty in an amount up to three times the total amount found to be due. Further, if the amount of salary owed to an employee pursuant to this chapter but not paid to the employee in violation of thereof exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), it shall constitute a misdemeanor and shall be referred to the office of the attorney general. The misdemeanor shall be punishable for a period of not more than one year in prison and/or fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). In assessing the amount of the penalty, due consideration shall be given to the size of the employer’s business, the good faith of the employer, the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations, and the failure to comply with recordkeeping or other nonwage requirements. The surety of the person, firm, or corporation found to be in violation of the provisions of this chapter shall be bound to pay any penalties assessed on such person, firm, or corporation. The penalty shall be paid to the department of labor and training for deposit in the state treasury; provided, however, it is hereby provided that the general treasurer shall establish a dedicated “prevailing wages enforcement fund” for the purpose of depositing the penalties paid as provided herein. There is hereby appropriated to the annual budget of the department of labor and training the amount of the fund collected annually under this section, to be used at the direction of the director of labor and training for the sole purpose of enforcing prevailing wage rates as provided in this chapter.

For the purposes of this chapter, each day or part thereof of violation of any provision of this chapter by a person, firm, or corporation, whether the violation is continuous or intermittent, shall constitute a separate and succeeding violation.

In addition to the above, any person, firm, or corporation found in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter by the director of labor and training, an awarding authority, or the hearing officer, shall be ineligible to bid on, or be awarded work by, an awarding authority or perform any such work for a period of no less than eighteen (18) months and no more than thirty-six (36) months from the date of the order entered by the hearing officer. Once a person, firm, or corporation is found to be in violation of this chapter, all pending bids with any awarding authority shall be revoked, and any bid awarded by an awarding authority prior to the commencement of the work shall also be revoked.

In addition to the above, any person, firm, or corporation found to have committed two (2) or more willful violations in any period of eighteen (18) months of any of the provisions of this chapter by the hearing officer, which violations are not arising from the same incident, shall be ineligible to bid on, or be awarded work by, an awarding authority or perform any work for a period of sixty (60) months from the date of the second violation.

The order of the hearing officer shall remain in full force and effect unless stayed by order of the superior court.

The director of labor and training, awarding authority, or hearing officer shall notify the bonding company of any person, firm, or corporation suspected of violating any section of this chapter. The notice shall be mailed certified mail and shall enumerate the alleged violations being investigated.

In addition to the above, any person, firm, or corporation found to have willfully made a false or fraudulent representation on certified payroll records shall be referred to the office of the attorney general. A first violation of this section shall be considered a misdemeanor and shall be punishable for a period of not more than one year in prison and/or fined one thousand dollars ($1,000). A second or subsequent violation of this section shall be considered a felony and shall be punishable for a period of not more than three (3) years imprisonment, a fine of three thousand dollars ($3,000), or both. Further, any person, firm, or corporation found to have willfully made a false or fraudulent representation on certified payroll records shall be required to pay a civil penalty to the department of labor and training in an amount of no less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) and not greater than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per representation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 359, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 503, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 413, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 449, § 2.

37-13-15.
Review.

There is hereby created an appeals board which shall be comprised of three (3) members who shall be appointed by the governor; provided, however, that each member of the appeals board shall have at least five (5) years experience with prevailing wage rates as they apply to the construction industry. The members of the appeals board shall serve without compensation. The members of the appeals board shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years except that of the three (3) members originally appointed by each of the appointing authorities: one shall be appointed for a term of one year, one shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years, and one for a term of three (3) years.

Any person aggrieved by any action taken by the director of labor and training or his or her designated hearing officer under the authority of this chapter, or by the failure or refusal of the director of labor and training to take any action authorized by this chapter, may obtain a review thereof for the purpose of obtaining relief from the action or lack of action by filing a petition for administrative review and relief, to the appeals board as provided herein. The petition for administrative review shall be filed within twenty (20) days of the action taken by the director of labor and training or designated hearing officer. The petition for administrative review shall be heard within ten (10) days of the date of filing. An aggrieved person under this section shall include:

Any person who is required to pay wages to his or her employees or make payments to a fund on behalf of his or her employees, as provided in this chapter;

Any person who is required to be paid wages for his or her labor or on whose behalf payments are required to be paid to funds, as provided by this chapter;

The lawful collective bargaining representative of a person defined in subdivision (2) above;

A trade association of which a person defined in subdivision (1) above is a member;

A proper authority as defined in this chapter;

A contractor who submitted a bid for work to be or which has been awarded under the provisions of this chapter or a trade association of which he or she is a member; and

A labor organization which has one or more written collective bargaining agreements with one or more employers or a trade association which sets forth the hours, wages, and working conditions of a craft, mechanic, teamster, or type of worker needed to execute the work, as provided in this chapter to the extent that it would be affected by the action or the failure to act of the director of labor and training or the hearing officer.

Any aggrieved person as defined herein may obtain a review of a decision of the appeals board by filing a petition in the superior court in Providence county pursuant to the provisions of the administrative procedures act, praying for review and relief. The petition shall follow the course of and be subject to the procedures for causes filed in the court.

The director is hereby empowered to enforce his or her decision and/or the decision of the appeals board in the superior court for the county of Providence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 525, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 130, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 141, § 1.